Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2223.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1504.1. Advanced transmission technologies.(a) Submission of evidence.--The following shall apply to each transmission siting application or letter of notification filed with the commission under 52 Pa. Code Ch. 57 Subch. G (relating to commission review of siting and construction of electric transmission lines):(1) An electric distribution company shall provide evidence to the commission of the electric distribution company's evaluation and assessment of implementing advanced transmission technologies on existing transmission <--1234567891011121314151617 infrastructure and all proposed transmission infrastructure within the jurisdiction of the commission identified in the application or letter of notification.(2) The application or letter of notification under paragraph (1) shall not be granted, either as proposed or modified, unless the commission determines, in addition to any other existing criteria, that the proposed transmission lines incorporate all technically feasible and cost-effective advanced transmission technologies to achieve at least two of the following:(i) Avoid construction of new transmission infrastructure in whole or in part.(ii) Increase capacity, efficiency and reliability of the transmission system.(iii) Reduce transmission system congestion.(iv) Reduce environmental or aesthetic impacts.(b) Cost recovery.--Any additional costs borne by the electric distribution company in compliance with this section shall be recovered in accordance with a commission-approved tariff.(A) APPLICABILITY.--THIS SECTION SHALL APPLY TO EACH TRANSMISSION SITING APPLICATION FILED WITH THE COMMISSION UNDER 52 PA. CODE CH. 57 SUBCH. G (RELATING TO COMMISSION REVIEW OF SITING AND CONSTRUCTION OF ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION LINES) AND EACH LETTER OF NOTIFICATION IN LIEU OF APPLICATION FILED WITH THE COMMISSION UNDER 52 PA. CODE CH. 57 (RELATING TO ELECTRIC SERVICE).(B) EVIDENCE OF EVALUATION.--AN APPLICANT SHALL PROVIDE TO THE COMMISSION EVIDENCE THAT THE APPLICANT EVALUATED AND ASSESSED THE USE OF ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES FOR ANY 20260HB2223PN3177 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) EXISTING TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE.(2) PROPOSED TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE AND UPGRADES IDENTIFIED IN THE APPLICATION OR LETTER OF NOTIFICATION, INCLUDING INFRASTRUCTURE FOR WHICH THE PROPOSED VOLTAGE WOULD BE INCREASED ABOVE EXISTING LEVELS AND INFRASTRUCTURE THAT WOULD BE RECONDUCTORED OR RECONSTRUCTED WITHIN THE JURISDICTION OF THE COMMISSION.(C) COMMISSION DETERMINATION.--THE COMMISSION MAY NOT GRANT AN APPLICATION OR APPROVE A LETTER OF NOTIFICATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A), EITHER AS PROPOSED OR AS MODIFIED, UNLESS THE COMMISSION DETERMINES, IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER APPLICABLE REQUIREMENTS UNDER STATE LAW, THAT THE PROPOSED TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE INCORPORATES ALL TECHNICALLY FEASIBLE AND COST-EFFECTIVE ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES.(D) COMMISSION REQUIREMENTS.--NO LATER THAN ONE YEAR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS, ORDERS OR STATEMENTS OF POLICY SPECIFYING THE ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGY ASSESSMENT REQUIREMENTS AND METHODS THAT AN APPLICANT SHALL USE TO SATISFY SUBSECTION (B).(c) (E) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the commission's authority under any other provision of STATE law to regulate a public utility service or facility.(d) (F) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advanced power flow controller." A hardware or software technology that modulates circuit impedance or other electrical properties to reroute power flows and relieve congestion . 20260HB2223PN3177 - 3 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Advanced transmission technologies." A software or hardware technology that increases the capacity, efficiency, reliability or safety of an existing or new electric transmission system, including grid-enhancing technologies such as dynamic line rating, advanced power flow controllers and topology optimization software, high-performance conductors and other technologies designed to reduce transmission congestion."ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES." ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) GRID-ENHANCING TECHNOLOGIES, INCLUDING DYNAMIC LINE RATING, ADVANCED POWER FLOW CONTROLLER AND TOPOLOGY OPTIMIZATION SOFTWARE.(2) HIGH-PERFORMANCE CONDUCTORS.(3) ANY OTHER TECHNOLOGY IDENTIFIED BY THE COMMISSION THAT MAY AVOID THE CONSTRUCTION OF NEW TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE, INCREASE THE CAPACITY, EFFICIENCY OR RELIABILITY OF THE TRANSMISSION SYSTEM, REDUCE TRANSMISSION SYSTEM CONGESTION, REDUCE ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACTS OR PROVIDE OTHER BENEFITS TO THE TRANSMISSION SYSTEM."ALUMINUM CONDUCTOR STEEL REINFORCED CONDUCTOR." A STRANDED OVERHEAD ELECTRICAL CONDUCTOR COMPOSED OF ONE OR MORE LAYERS OF HARD-DRAWN ALUMINUM WIRE HELICALLY LAID AROUND A CENTRAL CORE OF GALVANIZED OR OTHERWISE COATED STEEL STRANDS, DESIGNED TO PROVIDE ENHANCED TENSILE STRENGTH AND ELECTRICAL CONDUCTIVITY FOR TRANSMISSION OR DISTRIBUTION APPLICATIONS."Dynamic line rating." A system that uses real-time or AND forecasted weather and operating conditions, including wind speed and direction, to determine the transfer capacity of a transmission line."High-performance conductor." A conductor used in an electric transmission system, including carbon fiber conductors, 20260HB2223PN3177 - 4 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 composite core conductors and superconductors, to which the following apply:(1) The conductor has a direct electrical resistance that is at least 10% lower than aluminum-conductor steel-reinforced conductors of a similar diameter and weight.(2) The conductor has an energy carrying capacity at least 75% greater than aluminum-conductor steel-reinforced conductors of a similar diameter and weight."HIGH-PERFORMANCE CONDUCTOR." A CONDUCTOR USED IN AN ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM, INCLUDING A CARBON FIBER CONDUCTOR, COMPOSITE CORE CONDUCTOR OR SUPERCONDUCTOR, THAT HAS ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) A SIMILAR DIAMETER AND WEIGHT AS A TRADITIONAL ALUMINUM CONDUCTOR STEEL REINFORCED CONDUCTOR.(2) A DIRECT ELECTRICAL RESISTANCE THAT IS AT LEAST 10% LOWER THAN A TRADITIONAL ALUMINUM CONDUCTOR STEEL REINFORCED CONDUCTOR OF A SIMILAR DIAMETER AND WEIGHT.(3) AN ENERGY-CARRYING CAPACITY THAT IS AT LEAST 75% GREATER THAN A TRADITIONAL ALUMINUM CONDUCTOR STEEL REINFORCED CONDUCTOR OF A SIMILAR DIAMETER AND WEIGHT."TOPOLOGY OPTIMIZATION SOFTWARE." SOFTWARE THAT IDENTIFIES SWITCHING CONFIGURATIONS TO REROUTE ELECTRICITY AND ALLEVIATE TRANSMISSION CONSTRAINTS.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2223PN3177 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324